Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168.1257] MINNESOTA GRANDPARENT PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 168.1293, the commissioner must issue Minnesota grandparent special plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) pays a fee in the amount specified under section 168.12, subdivision 5, for each set of plates, along with any other fees required by this chapter; new text end new text begin (3) contributes a minimum of $35 upon initial application and annually thereafter to the food shelf support account; and new text end new text begin (4) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin The commissioner must adopt a suitable plate design that includes an image of baby footprints to one side and reads "Minnesota proud grandparents." new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Plates transfer. new text end new text begin On application to the commissioner and payment of a transfer fee of $5, special plates issued under this section may be transferred to another motor vehicle if the subsequent vehicle is: new text end new text begin (1) qualified under subdivision 1, clause (1), to bear the special plates; and new text end new text begin (2) registered to the same individual to whom the special plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Contributions; account; appropriation. new text end new text begin Contributions collected under subdivision 1, clause (3), must be deposited in the food shelf support account, which is established in the special revenue fund. Money in the account is annually appropriated first to the commissioner of public safety to administer the account, and the remainder is appropriated to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for food shelf programs grants under section 142F.14. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for Minnesota grandparent plates issued on or after that date. new text end